Hawaii statutes.
§286-240 Disqualification, cancellation,
and downgrade. (a) The examiner of drivers shall disqualify any person
from driving a commercial motor vehicle for a period of not less than one year
if convicted of a first violation of:

(1) Driving a motor vehicle under the influence of
alcohol, a controlled substance, or any drug that impairs driving ability;

(2) Driving a commercial motor vehicle while the
alcohol concentration of the driver's blood is 0.04 or more grams of alcohol
per two hundred ten liters of breath or 0.04 or more grams of alcohol per one
hundred milliliters or cubic centimeters of blood;

(3) Refusing to submit to a test to determine the
driver's alcohol concentration while driving a motor vehicle as required under
sections 286-243 and 291E-11;

(4) Using a motor vehicle in the commission of any
felony;

(5) Leaving the scene of an accident involving the
motor vehicle driven by the person;

(6) Unlawful transportation, possession, or use of a
controlled substance while on duty;

(7) Driving a commercial motor vehicle when, as a
result of prior violations committed while operating a commercial motor
vehicle, the driver's commercial driver's license or commercial learner's
permit is revoked, suspended, or canceled, or the driver is otherwise
disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle; or

(8) Causing a fatality through the operation of a
commercial motor vehicle, including through the commission of the crimes of
manslaughter and negligent homicide in any degree.

(b) The examiner of drivers shall disqualify
any person for a period of not less than three years for any conviction of a
violation of any offense listed in subsection (a) that is committed while a
hazardous material required to be placarded under title 49 Code of Federal
Regulations, part 172, subpart F, is being transported.

(c) The examiner of drivers shall disqualify
any person from driving a commercial motor vehicle for life if the person is
convicted two or more times for any of the offenses listed in subsection (a).

(d) The examiner of drivers shall disqualify
any person from driving a commercial motor vehicle for life if the person uses
a motor vehicle in the commission of any felony involving the manufacturing,
distributing, or dispensing of a controlled substance, or possession with
intent to manufacture, distribute, or dispense a controlled substance.

(e) The examiner of drivers shall disqualify
any person from driving a commercial motor vehicle for a period of not less
than sixty days if the person is convicted of two serious traffic violations,
or one hundred twenty days if the person is convicted of three serious traffic
violations; provided that the violations are committed in a commercial motor
vehicle and arise from separate incidents occurring within a three-year
period. The one hundred twenty-day disqualification period required for a
third conviction within three years of a serious traffic violation, as defined
in section 286-231, shall be in addition to any other previously imposed period
of disqualification. The disqualification periods specified in this subsection
shall also apply to offenses committed while operating a noncommercial motor
vehicle only if the conviction for the offense results in the revocation,
cancellation, or suspension of the driver's license.

(f) The examiner of drivers shall disqualify
any person from driving a commercial motor vehicle or from resubmitting an
application for a period of not less than sixty days if the examiner of drivers
finds that a commercial driver's license or a commercial learner's permit
holder or applicant for a commercial driver's license or commercial learner's
permit has falsified information or failed to report or disclose required
information either before or after issuance of a commercial driver's license or
a commercial learner's permit.

(g) The examiner of drivers shall disqualify
any person from driving a commercial motor vehicle for a period of not less
than one hundred eighty days and not more than one year for a first violation,
for at least two years and not more than five years for a second violation, and
at least three years and not more than five years for a third or subsequent
violation of a driver or vehicle out-of-service order committed in a commercial
motor vehicle transporting non-hazardous materials arising from separate
incidents occurring within a ten-year period.

(h) The examiner of drivers shall disqualify
any person from driving a commercial motor vehicle for a period of not less
than one hundred eighty days and not more than two years for a first violation
and for at least three years and not more than five years for any subsequent
violation of a driver or vehicle out-of-service order committed in a commercial
motor vehicle transporting hazardous materials required to be placarded under title
49 Code of Federal Regulations, part 172, subpart F, or designed to transport
sixteen or more occupants including the driver; provided that each violation
arises from separate incidents occurring within a ten-year period.

(i) The examiner of drivers shall disqualify
any person from driving a commercial motor vehicle for a period of not less
than sixty days if the person is convicted of a first violation, not less than
one hundred twenty days if the person is convicted of a second violation during
any three-year period, and not less than one year if the person is convicted of
a third or subsequent violation during any three-year period of a federal,
state, or local law or regulation pertaining to one of the following six
offenses at a railroad-highway grade crossing:

(1) For all drivers who are not required to always
stop, failing to slow down and check that the tracks are clear of an
approaching train;

(2) For all drivers who are not required to always
stop, failing to stop before reaching the crossing, if the tracks are not
clear;

(3) For all drivers who are always required to stop,
failing to stop before driving onto the crossing;

(4) For all drivers, failing to have sufficient space
to drive completely through the crossing without stopping;

(5) For all drivers, failing to obey a traffic
control device or the directions of an enforcement official at the crossing; or

(6) For all drivers, failing to negotiate a crossing
because of insufficient undercarriage clearance.

(j) The examiner of drivers shall disqualify
any person from driving a commercial motor vehicle if the driver's driving is
determined to constitute an imminent hazard, as defined in section 286-231 and
in accordance with the provisions of title 49 Code of Federal Regulations section
383.52.

(k) Beginning January 30, 2014, if a driver
fails to provide the examiner of drivers with the certification required under title
49 Code of Federal Regulations section 383.71(a)(1)(ii) or a current medical
examiner's certificate if the driver self-certifies according to title 49 Code
of Federal Regulations section 383.71(a)(1)(ii)(A) that the driver is operating
in non-excepted interstate commerce as required by title 49 Code of Federal
Regulations section 383.71(h), the examiner of drivers shall mark the
commercial driver's license information system driver record as not-certified
and initiate a commercial driver's license downgrade. [L 1989, c 320, pt of §2;
am L 1990, c 342, §10; am L 1995, c 114, §4; am L 2002, c 70, §2; am L 2004, c
103, §8; am L 2006, c 130, §6; am L 2010, c 15, §1; am L 2011, c 67, §2 and c
121, §4; am L 2013, c 114, §10]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next